California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
Warrant officers of the National Guard shall be appointed by the Governor. The classes of persons from which warrant officers may be appointed shall be the same as are provided in the rules and regulations adopted by the United States for the control, administration and government of the National Guard so far as the same are not inconsistent with this code and from former commissioned or warrant officers of the United States Army, United States Air Force, United States Navy, or any reserve component thereof, who were honorably separated therefrom but are no longer eligible for federal recognition. Warrant officers shall be separated from the service, discharged and dismissed and shall have the same privileges respecting retirement as commissioned officers, and shall have all other powers, privileges and duties authorized by the laws and regulations of the United States and customs of the service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 119.)
-------------------------------------------

226.

Every officer shall provide himself with the arms, uniforms, and equipment prescribed and approved by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 120.)
-------------------------------------------

227.

When an officer of the National Guard is sixty-four years of age, he shall be retired from active service and placed on the retired list.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

228.

(a) A commissioned or warrant officer of the California National Guard who has served 20 years in the active service of the state may, on application, in the discretion of the Governor, be retired. Service in the United States Army, United States Air Force, United States Navy, or any reserve component thereof is considered state service in computing length of state service for the purposes of this section.

(b) Upon application made within one year of retirement, the officer may, in the discretion of the Governor, be granted an honorary advancement to the next grade above that held on the date of application for retirement. The Adjutant General shall adopt regulations governing the application procedure, qualifications required, and rights and privileges in connection with honorary post-retirement promotions under this subdivision. If recalled to either state or federal active service, a person honorarily promoted under this subdivision shall return to duty in that grade specified by federal law or regulations applicable to the person.

(c) Commissioned and warrant officers on active duty with the office of the Adjutant General pursuant to Section 167 who are not members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and who have been on active duty with the office of the Adjutant General for a total of 10 years shall, on application, be retired in accordance with the federal law and regulations which on the date of application govern the retirement of commissioned and warrant officers of the reserve components of the Army of the United States on extended active duty. Retirement from state active duty with the office of the Adjutant General does not prohibit a person from active service in the California National Guard. In these cases, the length of service shall be computed as provided in this section and Section 215.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 355, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

229.

When a board of officers finds that an officer is incapacitated for active service, and that their incapacity is the result of an incident of the service, and its decision is approved by the Governor, the officer shall be retired from active service and placed on the retired list of officers. When a board of officers finds the incapacity of an officer is not the result of any incident of the service, and its decision is approved by the Governor, the officer shall be retired from active service, or discharged, as the Governor determines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 17.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

230.

The Governor may detail, with their own consent, officers or noncommissioned officers of the retired list to active duty and return them to the retired list in their discretion. Officers or noncommissioned officers retired for age may not be detailed to command troops, but only to perform duties of staff corps or departments, or to sit on boards, except in time of war or other emergency, or imminent danger thereof, when retired officers or noncommissioned officers may be detailed by the Governor, without their consent, to perform any military duty designated by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 18.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

231.

The provisions of sections 232 to 237, inclusive, shall apply with equal force to commissioned officers of the National Guard and the unorganized militia when called into active service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

232.

The commission of an officer shall be vacated by death, by acceptance by proper authority of resignation, by discharge on account of inefficiency, for physical disqualifications, when dropped from the rolls for an absence without leave for three months, by discharge to accept a commission in the United States Army, United States Air Force, United States Navy, or a reserve component thereof, when transferred to the United States Army Reserve upon the expiration of six months as a member of the Inactive National Guard, upon a finding by the Adjutant General that the officer is a security risk as a result of subversive activity, for personal traits of character, or by dismissal pursuant to sentence of a general court-martial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 161.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

232.5.

An officer who resides outside this state shall be permitted to transfer to the National Guard of any other state or territory or to the United States Army Reserve, the United States Air Force Reserve, or another federal military reserve component, in accordance with federal law, including, but not limited to, federal military service regulations. The state shall not grant an officer’s transfer to
 the National Guard of any other state or territory or to a federal military reserve component if the officer is under investigation, under charges, awaiting result of trial, absent without leave, absent in the hands of civil authorities, in default with respect to state or federal funds or property, mobilized for deployment on state or federal duty, or notified of impending mobilization for state or federal military duty.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 221, Sec. 2.   (SB 747)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

233.

An officer who desires to resign shall submit their resignation to the Governor, whose action thereon shall be final. The Governor may refuse to accept a resignation when the officer is under investigation, under charges, awaiting the result of a trial, absent without leave, absent in the hands of civil authorities, in default with respect to state or federal funds or property, mobilized for deployment on state or federal duty, or notified of impending mobilization for state or federal military duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 19.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

234.

At any time the moral character, capacity, and general fitness for service of an officer may be determined by an efficiency board. The board shall be appointed by order of the Governor, and shall consist of three commissioned officers, senior in rank to the officer under investigation. The findings and recommendations of the board shall be transmitted to the Governor, who shall approve or disapprove the findings. If the approved findings are unfavorable to the officer, he shall be ordered discharged.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

235.

At any time the physical fitness for service of an officer may be determined by a board of three medical officers, which shall be appointed by the Governor for that purpose. The findings and recommendations of the board shall be transmitted to the Governor. If the officer is found to be physically unfit for service and the finding is approved by the Governor, he shall be ordered discharged or retired from active service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

236.

An officer absent without leave for a period of three months shall, with the approval of the Governor, be discharged. Such discharge shall be a general discharge under honorable conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 193.)
-------------------------------------------

237.

An officer may be dismissed from the service only by sentence of a general court-martial, which sentence is approved by the Governor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

238.

No officer who has been dismissed from the military or naval service of the State shall be permitted again to enter the military or naval service of the State without the approval of the Governor of this State. No officer who has resigned for the good of the service, or who has been discharged under conditions other than honorable on account of inefficiency, or on account of absence without leave, shall be permitted to enter the military or naval service of the State without the approval of the Governor of this State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 193.)
-------------------------------------------

239.

The Governor may assign, reassign, or transfer commissioned officers and warrant officers from one organization to another or to the retired or the reserve list when deemed for the benefit of the California National Guard. The Governor may direct the Adjutant General to take any action under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 566, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

240.

(a) A person is not eligible to commission as an officer or warrant officer in the California National Guard if they actively participate
 in any of the following:

(1) Advocating for, or engaging in, the use of unlawful force, unlawful violence, or other illegal means to deprive an individual of their rights under the United States Constitution or the laws of the United States, the California Constitution or the laws of this state, or a political subdivision thereof.

(2) Advocating for, or engaging in, the use of unlawful force or violence to achieve goals that are political, religious, discriminatory, or ideological in nature.

(3) Advocating for, engaging in, or supporting terrorism
 within the United States or abroad.

(4) Advocating for, engaging in, or supporting the overthrow of the government of the United States, or any political subdivision thereof, including the government of this state or that of any other state, commonwealth, territory, or the District of Columbia, by force of violence, or seeking to alter the form of these governments by unconstitutional or other unlawful means.

(5) Advocating or encouraging military, civilian, or contractor personnel within the California National Guard or State Guard to violate the laws of the United States, or any political subdivision thereof, including the laws of this state or those of any other state, commonwealth, territory, or the District of Columbia, or to disobey lawful orders or regulations, for the
 purpose of disrupting military activities, or personally undertaking the same.

(6) Advocating for widespread unlawful discrimination based on race, color, national origin, religion, sex, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

(7) Advocating for, engaging in, or supporting treason, as defined in Section 37 of the Penal Code or Section 2381 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(8) Advocating for, engaging in, or supporting an act of rebellion or insurrection, as defined in Section 2383 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(b) An officer who actively participates in any of the conduct set forth in subdivision (a) shall receive an other than honorable discharge, in accordance with United States Department of Defense regulations and any applicable procedures and regulations of the individual service branches.

(c) “Active participation” has the same meaning as in the Department of Defense Instruction 1325.06 or any successor instruction or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 774, Sec. 1.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Enlisted Persons [250. - 270.]

250.

The qualifications for enlistment and re-enlistment in the National Guard and the term and the form of oath shall at all times conform to the requirements of the laws of the United States and of this State and the regulations from time to time promulgated by the Department of the Army or the Department of the Air Force of the United States for the government and guidance of the National Guard except for former enlisted members of the United States Army, United States Air Force, United States Navy, or any reserve component thereof, who were honorably separated therefrom but are no longer qualified for enlistment under the laws of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 122.)
-------------------------------------------

251.

Every person who enlists or reenlists shall sign the enlistment papers and take the oath required by the laws and regulations of this State and of the United States. Such oath shall be taken before any military or naval officer authorized to administer oaths by the regulations or laws of the United States or of this State. Any wilfully false statement so sworn to is perjury.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

252.

Appointments of noncommissioned and petty officers shall conform to the tables of organization and to the rules and regulations prescribed by the United States for the government and administration of the National Guard. All noncommissioned and petty officers shall be appointed by the commanding officer of the division, brigade, regiment, separate battalion, squadron, marine division, or similar organization, upon the recommendation of the commanding officer of the unit in which they are to serve. Noncommissioned and petty officers of separate companies, troops, batteries, detachments, and similar units, not forming part of an existing higher tactical organization, shall be appointed by the Adjutant General. When an examination is required by federal laws or
 regulations or by state regulations, an enlisted person shall not be appointed until they have successfully passed the examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 20.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

253.

Privates, privates first class and noncommissioned officers shall be appointed within authorized allotments and pursuant to the rules and regulations prescribed by the United States for the government and administration of the National Guard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1952, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

254.

Enlisted persons may be transferred to or from organizations or units. Noncommissioned officers may be reduced one or more grades upon good cause appearing therefor. In transferring or reducing an enlisted person or noncommissioned officer the procedure laid down in regulations for the National Guard shall be followed.

An order discharging a member of the militia may be vacated by the Adjutant General for good cause; provided, a certificate or other evidence of discharge has not been delivered to the discharged member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 9.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

255.

Every enlisted person who enters the National Guard or who is a member of the unorganized militia when called into the service of the state, may be provided by the state with a service or dress uniform, or both, corresponding in make and general appearance to the service or dress uniform of the United States Army.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 10.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

256.

(a) An enlisted member of the California National Guard who has served 20 years in the active service of the state may, on application, in the discretion of the Governor, be retired. Service in the United States Army, United States Air Force, United States Navy, or any reserve component thereof shall be considered as state service in computing length of state service for the purposes of this section.

(b) Upon application made within one year of retirement, the person may, in the discretion of the Governor, be granted an honorary advancement to the next rank above that held on the date of application for retirement. The Adjutant General shall adopt regulations governing the application procedure, qualifications required, and rights and privileges in connection with honorary post-retirement promotions. If recalled to either state or federal active service, a person honorarily promoted under this subdivision shall return to duty in that rank specified by federal law or regulations applicable to the person.

(c) An enlisted member on active duty with the office of the Adjutant General pursuant to Section 167 who is not a member of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and who has been on active duty with the office of the Adjutant General for a total of 10 years shall, on application, be retired in accordance with the federal law and regulations which on the date of application govern the retirement of enlisted members of the reserve components of the Army of the United States on extended active duty. In these cases, the length of service shall be computed as provided in this section and Section 215.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 355, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

257.

When an enlisted person of the National Guard is 64 years of age, they shall be retired from active service or discharged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 136.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

258.

In time of war or other emergency or imminent danger thereof, the Governor may detail retired enlisted persons to active duty and on conclusion of the emergency return them to the retired list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 12.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

259.

Separation from service of an enlisted person of the National Guard or the unorganized militia called into active service is effected by death or by discharge by proper authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 13.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

260.

The following are causes for discharge of enlisted personnel:

(a) Expiration of term of service.

(b) Attainment of the age of 64 years.

(c) Acceptance of appointment as a commissioned officer in the state or federal service.

(d) To enlist in the United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, Space Force, or Coast Guard.

(e) To accept appointment in the United States Military Academy, Naval Academy, Air Force Academy, or Coast Guard Academy.

(f) To accept appointment as a flying cadet.

(g) To re-enlist.

(h) Discontinuance of the organization in which the person is serving.

(i) Change of residence.

(j) Certificate of disability.

(k) Inaptness or misconduct.

(l) Fraudulent enlistment.

(m) Action of civil or military court.

(n) Draft into the service of the United States.

(o) Business or educational interference.

(p) Any other reason the Governor deems adequate and satisfactory.

(q) For the best interests of the military service.

(r) For the good of the service.

(s) For absence without leave.

(t) Active participation in any of the conduct set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 240.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 774, Sec. 2.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

261.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the discharge of enlisted personnel under the provisions of Section 260 shall be effected by order of the Governor, under those regulations as may be prescribed, or as may be authorized by the laws and regulations prescribed for the government of the National Guard by the United States and that are not inconsistent with this code.

(2) An enlisted person shall receive an other than honorable discharge
 pursuant to subdivision (t) of Section 260, in accordance with United States Department of Defense regulations and any applicable procedures and regulations of the individual service branches.

(b) The Adjutant General may discharge a person who is absent without leave for a period of 90 days or more. The discharge under this subdivision shall be a general discharge under honorable conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 774, Sec. 3.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

262.

An enlisted person discharged from the National Guard or the unorganized militia when called or ordered into active service of the state shall receive a discharge in writing in a form and with those qualifications as may be prescribed under the laws and regulations prescribed for the government of the National Guard by the United States and that are not inconsistent with this code. The certificates of discharge may be in the form of an honorable, a general, or undesirable discharge. Bad conduct and dishonorable discharges shall be awarded only by courts-martial as provided in this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 14.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

263.

When an enlisted person of the National Guard or the unorganized militia called into active service is absent without leave and there is reason to believe that the enlisted person does not intend to return, or quits their organization or place of duty with the intent to avoid hazardous duty or to shirk important service, that person is a deserter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 22.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

264.

With the express authority of the Governor, a deserter may be dropped from the rolls of his organization. Any soldier discovered to be a deserter from the military or naval service of the United States shall, if not under charges, be dropped from the rolls.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

265.

Lists of deserters shall be published by The Adjutant General in orders, from time to time as the Governor directs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

266.

An enlisted person who has been dropped as a deserter shall not be restored to duty without prior disposition of the charge of desertion standing against them. The charge shall be disposed of by trial by court-martial; by restoration to duty, desertion admitted, upon a written application of the soldier admitting the desertion; or by the setting aside of the charge of desertion when it had been erroneously made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 23.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

267.

A deserter shall not be restored to duty without trial except by the Governor or by an officer authorized to appoint a general court-martial. Restoration to duty without trial shall not remove the charge of desertion or relieve the enlisted person from any of the forfeitures attached to that offense. Setting aside a charge of desertion as having been erroneously made shall remove the charge of desertion and all stoppages and forfeitures arising therefrom.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 17.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

268.

All time lost while absent without leave or in desertion, in excess of twenty-four hours, shall be made good unless the enlisted person is sooner discharged by proper authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 18.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

269.

No enlisted person who has been dishonorably discharged from the military or naval service of this state, or of another state, territory or district, or of the United States shall be permitted to enter again the military or naval service of this state without the approval of the Governor of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 19.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

270.

A person is not eligible to enlist in the California National Guard if they actively participate in any of the conduct set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 240.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 774, Sec. 4.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. The Naval Militia [280. - 301.]

280.

Except where this chapter is inconsistent therewith, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 210) of Part 1 of Division 2 is hereby incorporated by reference in this chapter and those provisions shall apply to the Naval Militia and the officers and enlisted persons thereof with the same force and effect as if the provisions were set out in detail in this chapter.

In applying Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 210) of Part 1 of Division 2 to this chapter, the term “Naval Militia” shall be substituted for the term “National Guard” and the term “Navy Department” for the term “War Department.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 20.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

281.

As used in this division in connection with the Naval Militia:

(a) “Division” and “company” shall have the same meaning and effect as “company” when used in connection with the infantry of the National Guard;

(b) “Battalion” shall have the same meaning and effect as “battalion” when used in connection with the infantry of the National Guard.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

282.

The Naval Militia shall be located throughout the State at the discretion of the Governor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

283.

The organization of the Naval Militia shall conform generally to the provisions of the laws of the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

284.

The Naval Militia shall be organized into one or more naval brigades which shall consist of such administrative battalions prescribed by the Navy Department for a like number of divisions in the United States Navy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

285.

The Naval Militia shall consist of such number of deck and engineer divisions, companies of marines, aeronautic and other organizations as the Governor prescribes in conformity with the requirements of the Navy Department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

286.

The several divisions, companies of marines, and other organizations of the Naval Militia may be organized into battalions at the discretion of the Governor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

287.

The numerical strength, rank, titles, and insignia of rank of the divisions and companies of marines of the Naval Militia shall conform to the laws, rules, and regulations of the United States Navy, and the rules and regulations prescribed by the Secretary of the Navy for the Naval Militia.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

288.

In order to select a commanding officer for the Naval Militia, The Adjutant General shall nominate not to exceed three officers, not below the grade of lieutenant commander, and shall cause such candidates to be examined. The candidate receiving the highest rating in such examination shall be recommended by The Adjutant General to the Governor for commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

289.

The officers, chief warrant officers, warrant officers, and enlisted persons of the Naval Militia shall be of any amount and grades prescribed by the Governor and shall be of the same number and grades as are authorized or prescribed by the laws and regulations of the United States for similar organizations of the United States Navy or as authorized or prescribed by the laws and regulations of the Navy Department for the Naval Militia.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 21.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

290.

Chief warrant officers may be appointed by the Governor upon the recommendation of the commanding officer of the Naval Militia and shall receive from the Governor a commission in the same form as commissioned officers of the Naval Militia.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

291.

Warrant officers may be appointed by The Adjutant General upon the recommendation of the commanding officer of the Naval Militia. Warrants for warrant officers shall be issued by The Adjutant General upon the recommendation of the commanding officer of the Naval Militia.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

292.

Chief petty officers and petty officers may be appointed by the commanding officer of the Naval Militia, who shall issue to such chief petty officers and petty officers a warrant in proper form.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

293.

When vacancies occur in the commissioned personnel, the commanding officer of the Naval Militia shall recommend not to exceed three candidates to The Adjutant General who shall cause such candidates to be examined. The candidate receiving the highest rating in such examination shall be recommended by The Adjutant General to the Governor for commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

294.

The system of discipline and exercise shall conform to that of the Navy of the United States, to the system of discipline and exercise prescribed by the provisions of this code relating to the National Guard, and to that prescribed by the Secretary of the Navy for the guidance of the Naval Militia.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

295.

The Governor may alter, divide, annex, consolidate, and disband the Naval Militia or any portion thereof whenever in his judgment the efficiency of the State forces will thereby be increased. He may also make rules and regulations for the use, government, and instruction of the Naval Militia. Such rules and regulations shall conform to those governing the United States Navy and those prescribed by the Secretary of the Navy for the conduct of the Naval Militia.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

296.

Every enlisted person who enters the Naval Militia may be provided by the state with a service or dress uniform, or both, corresponding in make and appearance to the service or dress uniform of the United States Navy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 22.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

297.

In a locality where there are insufficient persons available to form an engineer division and there already exists an organized deck division, men and women of the artificer branch may be additionally enrolled in the deck division with those ratings as they may be qualified to fill, until there is a sufficient number of them to form a separate engineer division. Any men and women in the artificer branch may be rated in the various petty officers’ ratings in the artificer branch of the naval service that they are qualified to fill. In a locality where there are insufficient persons available to form a marine company and there is already existing in that locality a deck division of the Naval Militia, a marine section may be organized with one officer and not less than twenty enlisted marines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 114, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

298.

The Governor may apply to the President of the United States for the detail of commissioned officers and petty officers of the Navy to act as inspectors and instructors in the art of naval warfare.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

299.

Vessels lent by the United States to this State for the use of the Naval Militia shall be commanded by the ranking officer for line duty resident at the port to which the vessel is assigned, and in the absence of such ranking officer for line duty, by the next ranking officer for line duty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

300.

Summary courts-martial and deck courts for the Naval Militia may be ordered by the commanding officer of the Naval Militia and general courts-martial for the Naval Militia may be ordered by the Governor and shall be organized and conducted within the laws, regulations, and usages of the United States Navy and the provisions of this division relating to military courts. The proceedings shall be reviewed and sentence executed as provided in this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

301.

Any member of the State Guard or Naval Militia, who at any time after December 7, 1941, has completed or shall hereafter and prior to the end of hostilities during World War II complete a minimum period of, 90 days’ service, and shall have continuously served under honorable conditions up to the time of his separation from such organization, is entitled to receive an honorable discharge from the State Guard or Naval Militia. The Adjutant General shall issue such honorable discharge upon the application of person entitled to such discharge. In the absence of official records as to applicant’s service, applicant shall have the burden of proving his service and the decision of The Adjutant General, in case of dispute, shall be final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Compensation, Allowance, and Insurance [320. - 346.]



  ARTICLE 1. Pay and Allowances [320. - 329.]

320.

Officers and warrant officers on active duty in the service of the State shall receive the same pay and allowances as officers of similar grade in the United States Army, United States Air Force and United States Navy. All full time active duty heretofore or hereafter performed in the service of the State shall be credited for purposes of determining longevity and service within the provisions of this section and Section 340 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1952, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

321.

Enlisted persons, while on active duty in the service of the state, shall receive the same pay and allowances as enlisted persons of similar grade in the United States Army, United States Air Force, and United States Navy, except that enlisted persons in the pay grade of E1 through E4 ordered to active duty pursuant to Section 143 or 146, while on active duty, shall receive not less than the minimum daily rate of pay applicable to a pay grade of E5 in the active military service of the United States. It is the intent of the Legislature that the foregoing minimum payments to enlisted persons in the pay grade of E1 through E4 may be paid from the State Emergency Fund when, in the judgment of the Director of Finance, there is a case of actual necessity for which no appropriation has been made. All full-time active duty previously or hereafter performed in the service of the state shall be credited for purposes of determining longevity and service within the provisions of this section and Section 340.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 23.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

322.

Officers, warrant officers, and enlisted persons on active duty in the service of the state, except in situations described in Section 188, shall be reimbursed for their necessary traveling and other expenses in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the Department of Human Resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 24.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

323.

(a) A qualified member of the California National Guard Weapons of Mass Destruction Civil Support Team, as certified by the United States Department of Defense, is eligible to receive an annual State Retention Bonus in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) at the completion of each year of service on the team.

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified member” means a member of the California National Guard Weapons of Mass Destruction Civil Support Team who is certified as a hazardous materials specialist or technician under the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 155, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

324.

(a) Whenever an officer of the National Guard or Naval Militia is detailed for special duty in any matter relating to the National Guard or Naval Militia, by order of the Governor, that officer shall be allowed the same pay and allowances as officers of similar grade in the United States Army and United States Navy and actual traveling expenses. An enlisted person similarly detailed shall be allowed the same pay and allowances as enlisted persons of similar grade in the United States Army and United States Navy and actual traveling expenses, except that family allowances shall not be allowed to those enlisted persons. An officer of the National Guard or Naval Militia may, with their consent, be detailed for special duty without expense to the
 state, provided, however, the officer may be paid actual traveling expenses. An officer of the National Guard or Naval Militia may, with their consent, be detailed for duty and may be paid compensation in a grade lower than the officer actually holds provided the officer voluntarily waives all compensation in excess of the lower grade.

(b) If not inconsistent with the performance of required military duty, members of the National Guard may perform emergency services as defined in Section 18531 of the Government Code, and as provided in Section 19888 of the Government Code, and shall receive as compensation therefore the going wages paid for similar service at or near the place of performance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 24.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------
